test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VLONG_manidoo_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     manidoo: manidoo
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1manidoo: nimanidoo
     +Px2manidoo: gimanidoo
     +Px3manidoo: omanidoo
     +PxIndefmanidoo: imanidoo
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     manidoo+Dim: manidooens
     manidoo+Con: manidooenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     manidoo+Pos: manidooim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     manidoo+Pej: manidooish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     manidoo+Pos1Pl: manidooinaan
     manidoo+PosPl: manidooiwaa
     manidoo+PosObv: manidooini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     manidoo+Pret: manidooiban
     manidoo+VocPl: manidoo***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     manidoo+Obv: manidooan
     manidoo+Pl: manidooag
     manidoo+Loc: manidooing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1manidoo+Dim: nimanidooens
     +Px1manidoo+Con: nimanidooenh
     +Px2manidoo+Dim: gimanidooens
     +Px2manidoo+Con: gimanidooenh
     +Px3manidoo+Dim: omanidooens
     +Px3manidoo+Con: omanidooenh
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim: imanidooens
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con: imanidooenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1manidoo+Pos: nimanidooim
     +Px2manidoo+Pos: gimanidooim
     +Px3manidoo+Pos: omanidooim
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pos: imanidooim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1manidoo+Pej: nimanidooish
     +Px2manidoo+Pej: gimanidooish
     +Px3manidoo+Pej: omanidooish
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pej: imanidooish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1manidoo+Pos1Pl: nimanidooinaan
     +Px1manidoo+PosPl: nimanidooiwaa
     +Px1manidoo+PosObv: nimanidooini
     +Px2manidoo+Pos1Pl: gimanidooinaan
     +Px2manidoo+PosPl: gimanidooiwaa
     +Px2manidoo+PosObv: gimanidooini
     +Px3manidoo+Pos1Pl: omanidooinaan
     +Px3manidoo+PosPl: omanidooiwaa
     +Px3manidoo+PosObv: omanidooini
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pos1Pl: imanidooinaan
     +PxIndefmanidoo+PosPl: imanidooiwaa
     +PxIndefmanidoo+PosObv: imanidooini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1manidoo+Pret: nimanidooiban
     +Px1manidoo+VocPl: nimanidoo***idig, idog***
     +Px2manidoo+Pret: gimanidooiban
     +Px2manidoo+VocPl: gimanidoo***idig, idog***
     +Px3manidoo+Pret: omanidooiban
     +Px3manidoo+VocPl: omanidoo***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pret: imanidooiban
     +PxIndefmanidoo+VocPl: imanidoo***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1manidoo+Obv: nimanidooan
     +Px1manidoo+Pl: nimanidooag
     +Px1manidoo+Loc: nimanidooing
     +Px2manidoo+Obv: gimanidooan
     +Px2manidoo+Pl: gimanidooag
     +Px2manidoo+Loc: gimanidooing
     +Px3manidoo+Obv: omanidooan
     +Px3manidoo+Pl: omanidooag
     +Px3manidoo+Loc: omanidooing
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Obv: imanidooan
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pl: imanidooag
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Loc: imanidooing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     manidoo+Dim+Pos: manidooensim
     manidoo+Con+Pos: manidooenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     manidoo+Dim+Pej: manidooensish
     manidoo+Con+Pej: manidooenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     manidoo+Dim+Pos1Pl: manidooensinaan
     manidoo+Dim+PosPl: manidooensiwaa
     manidoo+Dim+PosObv: manidooensini
     manidoo+Con+Pos1Pl: manidooenhinaan
     manidoo+Con+PosPl: manidooenhiwaa
     manidoo+Con+PosObv: manidooenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     manidoo+Dim+Pret: manidooensiban
     manidoo+Dim+VocPl: manidooens***idig, idog***
     manidoo+Con+Pret: manidooenhiban
     manidoo+Con+VocPl: manidooenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     manidoo+Dim+Obv: manidooensan
     manidoo+Dim+Pl: manidooensag
     manidoo+Dim+Loc: manidooensing
     manidoo+Con+Obv: manidooenhan
     manidoo+Con+Pl: manidooenhag
     manidoo+Con+Loc: manidooenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     manidoo+Pos+Pej: manidooimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     manidoo+Pos+Pos1Pl: manidooiminaan
     manidoo+Pos+PosPl: manidooimiwaa
     manidoo+Pos+PosObv: manidooimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     manidoo+Pos+Pret: manidooimiban
     manidoo+Pos+VocPl: manidooim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     manidoo+Pos+Obv: manidooiman
     manidoo+Pos+Pl: manidooimag
     manidoo+Pos+Loc: manidooiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     manidoo+Pej+Pos1Pl: manidooishinaan
     manidoo+Pej+PosPl: manidooishiwaa
     manidoo+Pej+PosObv: manidooishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     manidoo+Pej+Pret: manidooishiban
     manidoo+Pej+VocPl: manidooish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     manidoo+Pej+Obv: manidooishan
     manidoo+Pej+Pl: manidooishag
     manidoo+Pej+Loc: manidooishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     manidoo+Pos1Pl+Pret: manidooinaaniban
     manidoo+Pos1Pl+VocPl: manidooinaan***idig, idog***
     manidoo+PosPl+Pret: manidooiwaaiban
     manidoo+PosPl+VocPl: manidooiwaa***idig, idog***
     manidoo+PosObv+Pret: manidooiniiban
     manidoo+PosObv+VocPl: manidooini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     manidoo+Pos1Pl+Obv: manidooinaanan
     manidoo+Pos1Pl+Pl: manidooinaanag
     manidoo+Pos1Pl+Loc: manidooinaaning
     manidoo+PosPl+Obv: manidooiwaaan
     manidoo+PosPl+Pl: manidooiwaaag
     manidoo+PosPl+Loc: manidooiwaaing
     manidoo+PosObv+Obv: manidooinian
     manidoo+PosObv+Pl: manidooiniag
     manidoo+PosObv+Loc: manidooiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     manidoo+Pret+Obv: manidooibanan
     manidoo+Pret+Pl: manidooibanag
     manidoo+Pret+Loc: manidooibaning
     manidoo+VocPl+Obv: manidoo***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+VocPl+Pl: manidoo***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+VocPl+Loc: manidoo***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1manidoo+Dim+Pos: nimanidooensim
     +Px1manidoo+Con+Pos: nimanidooenhim
     +Px2manidoo+Dim+Pos: gimanidooensim
     +Px2manidoo+Con+Pos: gimanidooenhim
     +Px3manidoo+Dim+Pos: omanidooensim
     +Px3manidoo+Con+Pos: omanidooenhim
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pos: imanidooensim
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pos: imanidooenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1manidoo+Dim+Pej: nimanidooensish
     +Px1manidoo+Con+Pej: nimanidooenhish
     +Px2manidoo+Dim+Pej: gimanidooensish
     +Px2manidoo+Con+Pej: gimanidooenhish
     +Px3manidoo+Dim+Pej: omanidooensish
     +Px3manidoo+Con+Pej: omanidooenhish
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pej: imanidooensish
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pej: imanidooenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1manidoo+Dim+Pos1Pl: nimanidooensinaan
     +Px1manidoo+Dim+PosPl: nimanidooensiwaa
     +Px1manidoo+Dim+PosObv: nimanidooensini
     +Px1manidoo+Con+Pos1Pl: nimanidooenhinaan
     +Px1manidoo+Con+PosPl: nimanidooenhiwaa
     +Px1manidoo+Con+PosObv: nimanidooenhini
     +Px2manidoo+Dim+Pos1Pl: gimanidooensinaan
     +Px2manidoo+Dim+PosPl: gimanidooensiwaa
     +Px2manidoo+Dim+PosObv: gimanidooensini
     +Px2manidoo+Con+Pos1Pl: gimanidooenhinaan
     +Px2manidoo+Con+PosPl: gimanidooenhiwaa
     +Px2manidoo+Con+PosObv: gimanidooenhini
     +Px3manidoo+Dim+Pos1Pl: omanidooensinaan
     +Px3manidoo+Dim+PosPl: omanidooensiwaa
     +Px3manidoo+Dim+PosObv: omanidooensini
     +Px3manidoo+Con+Pos1Pl: omanidooenhinaan
     +Px3manidoo+Con+PosPl: omanidooenhiwaa
     +Px3manidoo+Con+PosObv: omanidooenhini
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pos1Pl: imanidooensinaan
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+PosPl: imanidooensiwaa
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+PosObv: imanidooensini
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pos1Pl: imanidooenhinaan
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+PosPl: imanidooenhiwaa
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+PosObv: imanidooenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1manidoo+Dim+Pret: nimanidooensiban
     +Px1manidoo+Dim+VocPl: nimanidooens***idig, idog***
     +Px1manidoo+Con+Pret: nimanidooenhiban
     +Px1manidoo+Con+VocPl: nimanidooenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2manidoo+Dim+Pret: gimanidooensiban
     +Px2manidoo+Dim+VocPl: gimanidooens***idig, idog***
     +Px2manidoo+Con+Pret: gimanidooenhiban
     +Px2manidoo+Con+VocPl: gimanidooenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3manidoo+Dim+Pret: omanidooensiban
     +Px3manidoo+Dim+VocPl: omanidooens***idig, idog***
     +Px3manidoo+Con+Pret: omanidooenhiban
     +Px3manidoo+Con+VocPl: omanidooenh***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pret: imanidooensiban
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+VocPl: imanidooens***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pret: imanidooenhiban
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+VocPl: imanidooenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1manidoo+Dim+Obv: nimanidooensan
     +Px1manidoo+Dim+Pl: nimanidooensag
     +Px1manidoo+Dim+Loc: nimanidooensing
     +Px1manidoo+Con+Obv: nimanidooenhan
     +Px1manidoo+Con+Pl: nimanidooenhag
     +Px1manidoo+Con+Loc: nimanidooenhing
     +Px2manidoo+Dim+Obv: gimanidooensan
     +Px2manidoo+Dim+Pl: gimanidooensag
     +Px2manidoo+Dim+Loc: gimanidooensing
     +Px2manidoo+Con+Obv: gimanidooenhan
     +Px2manidoo+Con+Pl: gimanidooenhag
     +Px2manidoo+Con+Loc: gimanidooenhing
     +Px3manidoo+Dim+Obv: omanidooensan
     +Px3manidoo+Dim+Pl: omanidooensag
     +Px3manidoo+Dim+Loc: omanidooensing
     +Px3manidoo+Con+Obv: omanidooenhan
     +Px3manidoo+Con+Pl: omanidooenhag
     +Px3manidoo+Con+Loc: omanidooenhing
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Obv: imanidooensan
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pl: imanidooensag
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Loc: imanidooensing
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Obv: imanidooenhan
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pl: imanidooenhag
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Loc: imanidooenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1manidoo+Pos+Pej: nimanidooimish
     +Px2manidoo+Pos+Pej: gimanidooimish
     +Px3manidoo+Pos+Pej: omanidooimish
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pos+Pej: imanidooimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     +Px1manidoo+Pos+Pos1Pl: nimanidooiminaan
     +Px1manidoo+Pos+PosPl: nimanidooimiwaa
     +Px1manidoo+Pos+PosObv: nimanidooimini
     +Px2manidoo+Pos+Pos1Pl: gimanidooiminaan
     +Px2manidoo+Pos+PosPl: gimanidooimiwaa
     +Px2manidoo+Pos+PosObv: gimanidooimini
     +Px3manidoo+Pos+Pos1Pl: omanidooiminaan
     +Px3manidoo+Pos+PosPl: omanidooimiwaa
     +Px3manidoo+Pos+PosObv: omanidooimini
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pos+Pos1Pl: imanidooiminaan
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pos+PosPl: imanidooimiwaa
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pos+PosObv: imanidooimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     +Px1manidoo+Pos+Pret: nimanidooimiban
     +Px1manidoo+Pos+VocPl: nimanidooim***idig, idog***
     +Px2manidoo+Pos+Pret: gimanidooimiban
     +Px2manidoo+Pos+VocPl: gimanidooim***idig, idog***
     +Px3manidoo+Pos+Pret: omanidooimiban
     +Px3manidoo+Pos+VocPl: omanidooim***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pos+Pret: imanidooimiban
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pos+VocPl: imanidooim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     +Px1manidoo+Pos+Obv: nimanidooiman
     +Px1manidoo+Pos+Pl: nimanidooimag
     +Px1manidoo+Pos+Loc: nimanidooiming
     +Px2manidoo+Pos+Obv: gimanidooiman
     +Px2manidoo+Pos+Pl: gimanidooimag
     +Px2manidoo+Pos+Loc: gimanidooiming
     +Px3manidoo+Pos+Obv: omanidooiman
     +Px3manidoo+Pos+Pl: omanidooimag
     +Px3manidoo+Pos+Loc: omanidooiming
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pos+Obv: imanidooiman
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pos+Pl: imanidooimag
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pos+Loc: imanidooiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     +Px1manidoo+Pej+Pos1Pl: nimanidooishinaan
     +Px1manidoo+Pej+PosPl: nimanidooishiwaa
     +Px1manidoo+Pej+PosObv: nimanidooishini
     +Px2manidoo+Pej+Pos1Pl: gimanidooishinaan
     +Px2manidoo+Pej+PosPl: gimanidooishiwaa
     +Px2manidoo+Pej+PosObv: gimanidooishini
     +Px3manidoo+Pej+Pos1Pl: omanidooishinaan
     +Px3manidoo+Pej+PosPl: omanidooishiwaa
     +Px3manidoo+Pej+PosObv: omanidooishini
